Utah statutes.
9-4-904.   Creation -- Trustees -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Chair -- Powers --
Quorum -- Per diem and expenses.
(1) (a)  There is created an independent body politic and corporate,
constituting a public corporation, known as the "Utah Housing Corporation."
(b)  The corporation may also be known and do business as the:
(i)  Utah Housing Finance Association; and
(ii)  Utah Housing Finance Agency in connection with any contract entered into
when that was the corporation's legal name.
(c)  Any other entity may not use the names described in Subsections (1)(a)
and (b) without the express approval of the corporation.
(2)  The corporation shall be governed by a board of trustees composed of the
following nine trustees:
(a)  three ex officio trustees who shall be:
(i)  the executive director of the Department of Community and Culture or the
executive director's designee;
(ii)  the commissioner of the Department of Financial Institutions or the
commissioner's designee; and
(iii)  the state treasurer or the treasurer's designee; and
(b)  six public trustees, being private citizens of the state, as follows:
(i)  two people representing the mortgage lending industry;
(ii)  two people representing the home building and real estate industry; and
(iii)  two people representing the public at large.
(3)  The governor shall:
(a)  appoint the six public trustees of the corporation with the consent of
the Senate; and
(b)  ensure that:
(i)  the six public trustees are from different counties and are residents of
Utah; and
(ii)  not more than three of the public trustees belong to the same political
party.
(4) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (4)(b), the six public trustees
shall be appointed to terms of office of four years each.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (4)(a), the governor
shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms
to ensure that the terms of corporation trustees are staggered so that
approximately half of the board is appointed every two years.
(5) (a)  Any of the six public trustees of the corporation may be removed from
office for cause either by the governor or by an affirmative vote of any six
trustees of the corporation.
(b)  When a vacancy occurs in the board of trustees for any reason, the
replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
(c)  Each public trustee shall hold office for the term of appointment and
until the trustee's successor has been appointed and qualified.
(d)  Any public trustee is eligible for reappointment but may not serve more
than two full consecutive terms.
(6) (a)  The governor shall select the chair of the corporation.
(b)  The trustees shall elect from among their number a vice chair and other
officers they may determine.
(7) (a)  Five trustees of the corporation constitute a quorum for transaction
of business.
(b)  An affirmative vote of at least five trustees is necessary for any action
to be taken by the corporation.
(c)  A vacancy in the board of trustees may not impair the right of a quorum
to exercise all rights and perform all duties of the corporation.
(8) (a) (i)  Trustees who are not government employees may not receive
compensation or benefits for their services, but may receive a reasonable per
diem and reimbursement expenses incurred in the performance of the trustee's
official duties at the rates established by the board of trustees.
(ii)  Trustees may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.
(b) (i)  State government officer and employee trustees who do not receive
salary, per diem, or expenses from their agency for their service may receive
per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties
from the corporation at the rates established by the Division of Finance under
Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  State government officer and employee trustees may decline to receive
per diem and expenses for their service.
